Missouri, session 2026, SB1277.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 1.600, to read as
follows:
1.600. 1. Within fifteen days of receiving a guidance
document from the federal government, a state department
shall publish the guidance document in accordance with the
requirements of subsection 2 of this section.
2. (1) All guidance documents required to be published
under subsection 1 of this section shall be published on a
website designated by the department director under
subdivision (2) of this subsection.
(2) Not later than ninety days after the date of
enactment of this section, the director of each state
department shall designate a website on which guidance
documents shall be published.
(3) Each state department shall, for guidance
documents required to be published by the department under
subsection 1 of this section, publish in a conspicuous
manner a hyperlink on the department's website that provides
access to the guidance documents at the location described
in subdivision (1) of this subsection.

SB 1277 2
3. Within fifteen days of a guidance document being
rescinded, a state department shall maintain the rescinded
guidance document at the location described in subsection 2
of this section and indicate that the document has been
rescinded along with the date that the guidance document was
rescinded.
4. For purposes of this section, the term "guidance
document" means a federal agency statement of general
applicability, other than a rule that has the force and
effect of law promulgated in accordance with the notice and
comment procedures under 5 U.S.C. Section 553, that is
designated by an agency official as setting forth a policy
or interpretation on a statutory, regulatory, or technical
issue. This may include but is not limited to a memorandum,
notice, bulletin, directive, news release, letter, blog
post, or no-action letter. The term guidance document shall
be construed broadly to effectuate the purpose and intent of
this section.
✓